Maryland, session 2026, SB0146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
2–105.
(a) There is a supervisor for each county.
(b) (1) In this subsection and subsection (c) of this section, “appropriate county
official” means the Mayor of Baltimore City, the county commissioners or county council of
each county, or, if the county charter provides for a county executive, the county executive
with the approval of the county council.
(2) Each supervisor:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0146*

SENATE BILL 146
(i) shall be appointed by the Director; and
(ii) shall be in the management service of the State Personnel
Management System.
(3) The Director shall appoint each supervisor from a list of five qualified
individuals submitted to the Director by the appropriate county official. The Director shall
give the appropriate county official written notice that a vacancy exists in that county.
Unless the Director extends the period on written request from the appropriate county
official, the appropriate county official shall submit its list of nominees to the Director on
or before 60 days from the date the Director notifies the official of the vacancy.
(4) If the Director finds that none of the nominees on a list meets the
qualifications set under § 2–109 of this subtitle, the Director may reject all of them and
request the appropriate county official to provide a new list. If the appropriate county
official does not submit a new list within 20 days of receiving the Director’s request, the
Director may appoint any qualified individual.
(c) [(1)] In addition to the qualifications set under § 2–109 of this subtitle, a
supervisor[:
(i)] may not hold any other public office of profit[; and
(ii) on appointment, need not be a resident of the county for which
the supervisor was appointed, but shall become a resident of the county after the
appointment is made.
(2) The appropriate county official may waive the residency requirement of
paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection.
(3) If the appropriate county official nominates an individual under
subsection (b)(3) of this section who is not currently a resident of the county, the residency
requirement of paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection is waived for that individual].
(d) A supervisor may be removed from office only after a hearing before the
Department and a finding of incompetency or other cause.
(e) The classifications and salaries of supervisors shall be set in accordance with
the provisions of Division I of the State Personnel and Pensions Article.
2–106.
(a) Each county shall provide the supervisor of the county with an office in the
county [seat] or in Baltimore City, for the supervisor of Baltimore City. The Department is
responsible for providing each supervisor with clerical staff, equipment, and other facilities

SENATE BILL 146 3
and assistance that the Department considers necessary and as provided in the State
budget.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, each county and
Baltimore City shall be responsible for reimbursing the State for the costs of administering
the Department as follows:
(i) 90% of the costs of real property valuation;
(ii) 90% of the costs of business personal property valuation; and
(iii) 90% of the costs of the Office of Information Technology within
the Department, including any funding for departmental projects in the Major Information
Technology Development Project Fund established under § 3.5–309 of the State Finance
and Procurement Article.
(2) For each of fiscal years 2012 and 2013, each county and Baltimore City
shall be responsible for reimbursing the State 90% instead of 50% of the costs of
administering the Department described in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(c) Costs under subsection (b) of this section shall be allocated among the counties
and Baltimore City as follows:
(1) costs under subsection (b)(1)(i) and (iii) of this section will be allocated
based on the number of real property accounts of a county or Baltimore City as a percentage
of the total number of real property accounts statewide as of July 1 of the preceding fiscal
year; and
(2) costs under subsection (b)(1)(ii) of this section will be allocated based on
the business personal property assessable base of a county or Baltimore City as a
percentage of the total business personal property assessable bases statewide as of July 1
of the preceding fiscal year.
(d) Each county and Baltimore City shall remit a quarterly payment to the
Comptroller for 25% of the jurisdiction’s share of costs on the following dates:
(1) July 1;
(2) October 1;
(3) January 1; and
(4) April 1.
(e) The Comptroller may withhold a portion of a local income tax distribution of
a county or Baltimore City that fails to make timely payment in accordance with this
section.

SENATE BILL 146
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.